Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2031.05
Retired officer; reemployment; how treated.

A retired officer of the Nebraska State Patrol who becomes a member of the Nebraska State Patrol shall continue receiving retirement benefits and shall be treated for all purposes of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act as a new member of the system.

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 33.